Utah statutes.
70A-8-510.   Rights of purchaser of security entitlement from entitlement
holder.
(1) In a case not covered by the priority rules in Chapter 9a, Uniform
Commercial Code -- Secured Transactions, or the rules stated in Subsection
(3), an action based on an adverse claim to a financial asset or security
entitlement, whether framed in conversion, replevin, constructive trust,
equitable lien, or other theory, may not be asserted against a person who
purchases a security entitlement, or an interest therein, from an entitlement
holder if the purchaser gives value, does not have notice of the adverse
claim, and obtains control.
(2)  If an adverse claim could not have been asserted against an entitlement
holder under Section 70A-8-502, the adverse claim cannot be asserted against a
person who purchases a security entitlement, or an interest therein, from the
entitlement holder.
(3)  In a case not covered by the priority rules in Chapter 9a, Uniform
Commercial Code -- Secured Transactions, a purchaser for value of a security
entitlement, or an interest therein, who obtains control has priority over a
purchaser of a security entitlement, or an interest therein, who does not
obtain control. Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), purchasers who
have control rank according to priority in time of:
(a)  the purchaser’s becoming the person for whom the securities account, in
which the security entitlement is carried, is maintained, if the purchaser
obtained control under Subsection 70A-8-105(4)(a);
(b)  the securities intermediary’s agreement to comply with the
purchaser’s entitlement orders with respect to security entitlements carried
or to be carried in the securities account in which the security entitlement
is carried, if the purchaser obtained control under Subsection
70A-8-105(4)(b); or
(c)  if the purchaser obtained control through another person under Subsection
70A-8-105(4)(c), the time on which priority would be based under this
subsection if the other person were the secured party.
(4)  A securities intermediary as purchaser has priority over a conflicting
purchaser who has control unless otherwise agreed by the securities
intermediary.
